Utah statutes.
72-2-201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Fund" means the Transportation Infrastructure Loan Fund created under Section 72-2-202.

(2)  "Infrastructure assistance" means any use of fund money, except an infrastructure loan, to provide financial assistance for transportation projects, including:

(a)  capital reserves and other security for bond or debt instrument financing; or

(b)  any letters of credit, lines of credit, bond insurance, or loan guarantees obtained by a public entity to finance transportation projects.

(3)  "Infrastructure loan" means a loan of fund money to finance a transportation project.

(4)  "Public entity" means a state agency, county, municipality, local district, special service district, or an intergovernmental entity organized under state law.

(5)  "Transportation project":

(a)  means a project to improve a state or local highway; and

(b)  includes the costs of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipping, and fixturing.



Amended by Chapter 396, 2008 General Session

